District of Columbia statutes.
29-1205.09

Reimbursement, indemnification, advancement, and exoneration.

(a)

A statutory trust shall reimburse a trustee for any payment made by the trustee in the course of the trustee’s activities on behalf of the statutory trust, if the trustee complied with §§ 29-1205.05 and 29-1206.15 in making the payment.

(b)

A statutory trust may indemnify and hold harmless a trustee, beneficial owner, or person designated pursuant to § 29-1201.03(e)(8) or (9) with respect to any claim or demand against the person by reason of the person’s relationship with the trust if the claim or demand does not arise from the person’s bad faith, willful misconduct, or reckless indifference.

(c)

Expenses, including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs, incurred by a trustee, beneficial owner, or person designated pursuant to § 29-1201.03(e)(8) or (9) in connection with a claim or demand against the person by reason of the person’s relationship to a statutory trust may be paid by the trust before the final disposition of the claim or demand, upon an undertaking by or on behalf of the person to repay the trust if the person is ultimately determined not to be entitled to be indemnified under subsection (b) of this section.

(d)

A term in the governing instrument relieving or exonerating a trustee or person designated pursuant to § 29-1201.03(e)(8) or (9) from liability is unenforceable to the extent it relieves or exonerates the trustee from liability for conduct involving bad faith, willful misconduct, or reckless indifference.

(e)

A statutory trust may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of a trustee, person designated under § 29-1201.03(e)(8) or (9), or beneficial owner of the trust, against any liability asserted against or incurred by the trustee, person, or beneficial owner in that capacity, or arising from that status. The purchase and maintenance of insurance may occur even if, under § 29-1201.04(9), the trust instrument cannot limit or eliminate a person’s liability to the trust for the conduct giving rise to the liability.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(l)(6)(E), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1201.04.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section and the section heading.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 509 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.